Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 59.5
NO FEDERAL PREEMPTION UNDER
"SECONDARY MORTGAGE MARKET ENHANCEMENT ACT OF 1984"

Section

11-59.5-101. Investments in mortgage-related securities - no federal preemption.

No person, trust, corporation, partnership, association, business trust, or business entity or class thereof may purchase, hold, or invest in securities to which the provisions of paragraph (a) or (b) of section 106 of the federal "Secondary Mortgage Market Enhancement Act of 1984", Pub.L. 98-440, would otherwise be applicable except in accordance with any provision of Colorado law including, without limitation, the provisions of this title and of title 10, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 91, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

Entire article added, p. 54, § 1, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 59 by House Bill 91S2-1004, enacted at the Second Extraordinary Session of the Fifty-eighth General Assembly in 1991, but has been renumbered on revision for ease of location.

Cross references:

For the "Secondary Mortgage Market Enhancement Act of 1984", see Pub.L. 98-440, 98 Stat. 1689.